Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1414.10
Continuing education requirements;
suspended while on active duty with armed forces.

The continuing education requirements
of sections 81-1414.07 to 81-1414.09 shall be suspended for any law enforcement
officer while he or she is on active duty with the armed forces of the United
States.

Laws 2012, LB817, § 16.